Massachusetts, session 194th, H3693.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 26 of Chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting at the end thereof the following paragraph:- The 
registrar shall issue a report to the Department of Transportation (DOT) on public roadway 
damage resulting from an accident in which any person is killed or injured or in which there is 
damage in excess of one thousand dollars to any one vehicle or other property. The report shall 
be issued no more than thirty days after said accident.  
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.